Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-10,103
Injunction; when allowed.

No application or petition for injunction against any domestic, foreign, or alien society, or lodge thereof, shall be recognized in any court of this state unless made by the Attorney General upon request of the Director of Insurance.

Laws 1985, LB 508, § 32.